Vermont, session 2025-2026, H315.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Individuals with a disability continue to face unfair, preconceived,
and unnecessary societal biases as well as antiquated attitudes regarding their
ability to successfully parent their children or to be successful foster parents.
(2) Individuals with a disability face these biases and preconceived
attitudes in family law proceedings where parental rights and responsibilities
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 2 of 9
are at stake and in public and private adoption, guardianship, and foster care
proceedings.
(3) Because of these biases and attitudes, children of individuals with a
disability may be unnecessarily removed from their parents’ care or be limited
in enjoying meaningful time with their parents.
(b) The purpose of this act is to protect the best interests of children
parented by individuals with a disability and children who could be parented
by individuals with a disability through the establishment of procedural
safeguards that require individuals working with the Agency of Human
Services and with the judicial system to be knowledgeable about the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101, and the
procedural and equal protection rights of parents with disabilities or
prospective parents with disabilities.
Sec. 2. 15 V.S.A. § 665b is added to read:
§ 665b. NONDISCRIMINATION; PARENT WITH A DISABILITY
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Disability” with respect to an individual has the same meaning as in
9 V.S.A. § 4501.
(2) “Supportive parenting services” means services that may assist a
parent with a disability or prospective parent with a disability in the effective
use of nonvisual techniques, technology, and other alternative methods to
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 3 of 9
enable the parent to discharge parental responsibilities as successfully as a
parent who does not have a disability.
(b) A parent’s disability shall not serve as a basis for denial or restriction of
parental rights or responsibilities or parent-child contact when those rights,
responsibilities, and contact are determined to be otherwise in the best interests
of the child.
(c) Where a parent’s or prospective parent’s disability is alleged to have a
detrimental impact on a child, the party raising the allegation bears the burden
of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the behaviors are
endangering or will likely endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the child.
If this burden is met, the parent or prospective parent shall have the
opportunity to demonstrate how the implementation of supportive parenting
services can alleviate any concerns that have been raised. The court may
require that such supportive parenting services be put in place, with an
opportunity to review the need for continuation of such services within a
reasonable period of time.
(d) If the court determines that a disabled parent’s parental rights and
responsibilities or right to parent-child contact should be denied or limited in
any manner based on the parent’s disability, the court shall make specific
written findings stating the basis for such a determination and why the
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 4 of 9
provision of supportive parenting services is not a reasonable accommodation
that must be made to prevent such denial or limitation.
Sec. 3. 15A V.S.A. § 1-102 is amended to read:
§ 1-102. WHO MAY ADOPT OR BE ADOPTED
(a) Subject to this title, any person may adopt or be adopted by another
person for the purpose of creating the relationship of parent and child between
them.
(b) If a family unit consists of a parent and the parent’s partner, and
adoption is in the best interests of the child, the partner of a parent may adopt a
child of the parent. Termination of the parent’s parental rights is unnecessary
in an adoption under this subsection.
(c) A prospective parent’s disability shall not serve as a basis for the
person’s denial of participation in public or private adoption when the adoption
is determined to be otherwise in the best interests of the child. If a court
determines that a disabled prospective parent’s petition to adopt a child should
be denied, the court shall make specific written findings stating the basis for
such a determination and why the provision of supportive parenting services is
not a reasonable accommodation that must be made to prevent such denial or
limitation.
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 5 of 9
Sec. 4. 14 V.S.A. § 2628 is amended to read:
§ 2628. GUARDIANSHIP ORDER
(a) If the court grants a petition for guardianship of a child under
subsection 2626(d) or 2627(d) of this title, the court shall enter an order
establishing a guardianship and naming the proposed guardian as the child’s
guardian.
(b) A guardianship order issued under this section shall include provisions
addressing the following matters:
(1) the powers and duties of the guardian consistent with section 2629 of
this title;
(2) the expected duration of the guardianship, if known;
(3) a family plan on a form approved by the Court Administrator that:
(A) in a consensual case is consistent with the parties’ agreement; or
(B) in a nonconsensual case includes, at a minimum, provisions that
address parent-child contact consistent with section 2630 of this title; and
(4) the process for reviewing the order consistent with section 2631 of
this title.
(c) An individual’s disability shall not serve as a basis for denial of
guardianship of a child when the appointment is determined to be otherwise in
the best interests of the child. If a court determines that a disabled individual’s
appointment as a guardian should be denied or limited in any manner, the court
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 6 of 9
shall make specific written findings stating the basis for such a determination
and why the provision of supportive services is not a reasonable
accommodation that must be made to prevent such denial or limitation.
Sec. 5. 33 V.S.A. § 101 is amended to read:
§ 101. POLICY
It is the policy of the State of Vermont that:
(1) Its social and child welfare programs shall provide assistance and
benefits to persons of the State in proven need thereof and eligible for such
assistance and benefits under the provisions of this title.
(2) It is the purpose of its social and child welfare laws to establish and
support programs that contribute to the prevention of dependency and social
maladjustment and contribute to the rehabilitation and protection of persons of
the State.
(3) Assistance and benefits shall be administered promptly, with due
regard for the preservation of family life, and without restriction of individual
rights or discrimination on account of race, religion, political affiliation, or
place of residence within the State.
(4) The Department and the Family and Probate Divisions of the
Superior Court shall comply with Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of
1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S.
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 7 of 9
Constitution, prior to taking any action pursuant to chapters 49–53 of this title
that could impact the parental rights of a person with a disability.
(5) Assistance and benefits shall be so administered as to maintain and
encourage dignity, self-respect, and self-reliance. It is the legislative intent
that assistance granted shall be adequate to maintain a reasonable standard of
health and decency based on current cost of living indices. Notwithstanding
this subdivision, the Department will amend rules that establish new maximum
Reach Up grant amounts only when the General Assembly has taken
affirmative action to increase or decrease the Reach Up financial assistance
appropriation.
(5)(6) The programs of the Department for Children and Families shall
be designed to strengthen family life for the care and protection of children; to
assist and encourage the use by any family of all available personal and
reasonable community resources to this end; and to provide substitute care of
children only when the family, with the use of available resources, is unable to
provide the necessary care and protection to ensure the right of any child to
sound health and to normal physical, mental, spiritual, and moral development.
Sec. 6. 33 V.S.A. § 4907 is added to read:
§ 4907. NONDISCRIMINATION
An individual’s disability shall not:
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 8 of 9
(1) be presumed to have an adverse effect on the physical or emotional
well-being of a child; or
(2) serve as a basis for denial of foster care when the appointment is
determined to be otherwise in the best interests of the child.
Sec. 7. 33 V.S.A. § 5114 is amended to read:
§ 5114. BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD
(a) At the time of a permanency review under section 5321 of this title, a
modification hearing under section 5113 of this title, or at any time a petition
or request to terminate all residual parental rights of a parent without limitation
as to adoption is filed by the Commissioner or the attorney for the child, the
court shall consider the best interests of the child in accordance with the
following:
(1) the interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her
parents, siblings, foster parents, if any, and any other person who may
significantly affect the child’s best interests;
(2) the child’s adjustment to his or her home, school, and community;
(3) the likelihood that the parent will be able to resume or assume
parental duties within a reasonable period of time;
(4) whether the parent has played and continues to play a constructive
role, including personal contact and demonstrated emotional support and
affection, in the child’s welfare; and
VT LEG #380391 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.315
2025 Page 9 of 9
(5) if the court determines that a disabled parent’s parental rights and
responsibilities should be terminated based on the parent’s disability, the court
shall make written findings stating the basis for the determination and why
providing supportive parenting services is not a reasonable accommodation to
prevent the termination of rights and responsibilities.
(b) Except in cases where a petition or request to terminate all residual
parental rights of a parent without limitation as to adoption is filed by the
Commissioner or the attorney for the child, the court shall also consider
whether the parent is capable of playing a constructive role, including
demonstrating emotional support and affection, in the child’s welfare.
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380391 v.1